Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that:(1) The state is facing a substantial budget challenge, and all efforts must be made to identify and attain cost savings. Both the legislature and governor have sought strategies to achieve budget reductions.(2) Furthermore, the governor instructed state agencies to identify additional savings to streamline program effectiveness by reducing administration and overhead, including identifying savings related to reports and advisory committees.(3) Therefore, it is the intent of this act to prioritize limited state dollars and achieve savings by repealing certain legislative reports and an advisory committee that have substantially fulfilled their original mission or are duplicative of work done elsewhere. The legislature intends to deliver cost savings by repealing legislative reports and advisory committees that are either duplicative of work done by other agencies, committees, and working groups or, in the case of reports, either represent substantial work and overhead by agencies compared to their utility or are historically published long past the annual deadline for publication in statute.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.71C.100 (Annual reportâData confidentiality) and 2022 c 153 s 11 & 2019 c 334 s 10;(2) RCW 70.330.020 (Reports to governor and legislature) and 2016 c 56 s 2; and(3) RCW 71.24.546 (Substance use recovery services planâSubstance use recovery services advisory committeeâRulesâReport) and 2021 c 311 s 1.--- END ---